Vermont, session 2025-2026, S161.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 24 is added to read:
§ 24. GOVERNOR’S LIST OF SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING
ORGANIZATIONS
(a) Annually on December 1, the Governor, or designee, may elect to
provide a list of organizations that satisfy the conditions of subsection (b) of
this section to the U.S. Secretary of the Treasury for purposes of making the
federal qualified elementary and secondary education scholarship tax credit
available for Vermont taxpayers under 26 U.S.C. § 25F. It shall be presumed
VT LEG #385000 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.161
2026 Page 2 of 3
that an organization listed in the previous year will be listed in the subsequent
year unless the Governor finds that the organization has failed to meet the
requirements of this section.
(b) An organization shall not be listed unless the organization meets the
following criteria:
(1) it qualifies as a “scholarship granting organization” as defined under
26 U.S.C. § 25F(c)(5);
(2) it is a nonprofit organization with the core mission of providing
educational opportunities to economically underprivileged students through
afterschool, summer tutoring, and similar programs; and
(3) all grants and scholarships provided by the organization are to
students attending a public school, as defined in 16 V.S.A. § 11(7), or an
independent school, as defined in 16 V.S.A. § 11(8), that is also capable of
receiving public tuition.
(c) In the Governor’s discretion, the Governor may audit an organization
seeking placement on the list to ensure the organization meets all the
requirements for placement as provided by this section and applicable federal
law. The Governor shall not list an organization that the Governor knows is
not in compliance with the requirements of this section or 26 U.S.C.
§ 25F(c)(5).
VT LEG #385000 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.161
2026 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385000 v.4